Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2283.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-520a is hereby amended to read as
follows: 74-520a. (a) On and after March 15, 1995, The Kansas state fair
board is hereby established. The Kansas state fair board shall consist of the
following members:
(1) The secretary of agriculture or the successor of the secretary of
agriculture, or the secretary's designee;
(2) the secretary of commerce, or the secretary's designee;
(3) the director of extension of Kansas state university of agriculture
and applied science, or the director's designee;
(4) one person appointed by the governor from three persons
nominated by the Kansas chamber of commerce and industry;
(5) one person appointed by the governor from three persons
nominated by the travel industry association of Kansas;
(6) one person appointed by the governor from three persons
nominated by the Kansas fairs association; and
(7) seven people persons from the general public appointed by the
governor. Of such people appointed, one shall be from each of the five
extension areas, as established in subsection (e), and two shall represent
the state at large. Directors of each extension area shall submit three
nominations to the governor. Such persons nominated shall be actively
involved in agriculture production or agribusiness as follows:
(A) One person appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives to represent the state at large;
(B) one person appointed by the majority leader of the house of
representatives to represent the northwest extension area;
(C) one person appointed by the minority leader of the house of
representatives to represent the southwest extension area;
(D) one person appointed by the president of the senate to represent
the south central extension area;

HB 2283 2
(E) one person appointed by the majority leader of the senate to
represent the southeast extension area;
(F) one person appointed by the minority leader of the senate to
represent the northeast extension area; and
(G) one person who is a resident of Reno county appointed by the
governor to represent the state at large.
(b) Of the persons initially appointed by the governor under
subsection (a), three appointed by governor shall have a term of one year,
three appointed by the leadership of the house of representatives shall have
a term of two years and three appointed by the leadership of the senate
shall have a term of three years and until a successor is appointed and
qualified. Thereafter, all members shall have terms of three years and until
a successor is appointed and qualified.
(c) Any vacancy occurring on the Kansas state fair board shall be
filled as the original appointment was made.
(d) If any of the members able to appoint a designee does so, the
designee shall be appointed for a term of not less than one year.
(e) For the purpose of this section the state shall be divided into five
extension areas.
(1) The northwest extension area shall include the following counties:
Cheyenne, Rawlins, Decatur, Norton, Phillips, Smith, Osborne, Rooks,
Graham, Sheridan, Thomas, Sherman, Wallace, Logan, Gove, Trego, Ellis,
Russell, Barton, Rush and Ness.
(2) The southwest extension area shall include the following counties:
Greeley, Wichita, Scott, Lane, Pawnee, Hodgeman, Finney, Kearny,
Hamilton, Edwards, Ford, Gray, Haskell, Grant, Stanton, Morton, Stevens,
Seward, Meade, Clark, Comanche and Kiowa.
(3) The south central extension area shall include the following
counties: Lincoln, Ottawa, Dickinson, Ellsworth, Saline, Rice, McPherson,
Marion, Reno, Harvey, Butler, Kingman, Sedgwick, Cowley, Sumner,
Harper, Barber, Pratt and Stafford.
(4) The southeast extension area shall include the following counties:
Morris, Chase, Lyon, Osage, Franklin, Miami, Coffey, Anderson, Linn,
Bourbon, Allen, Woodson, Greenwood, Elk, Wilson, Neosho, Crawford,
Chautauqua, Montgomery, Labette and Cherokee.
(5) The northeast extension area shall include the following counties:
Jewell, Republic, Washington, Marshall, Nemaha, Brown, Doniphan,
Mitchell, Cloud, Clay, Riley, Pottawatomie, Jackson, Atchison, Jefferson,
Leavenworth, Wyandotte, Johnson, Douglas, Shawnee, Wabaunsee and
Geary.
(f) (1) The Kansas state fair board is authorized to establish a
nonprofit corporation organized under section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code of 1986. The board of directors of the nonprofit corporation

HB 2283 3
shall consist of the members of the executive committee of the fair board,
the general manager and other directors designated by the fair board.
(2) The purpose of the nonprofit corporation shall be to receive gifts,
donations, grants and other moneys and engage in fundraising projects for
the benefit of the Kansas state fair.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-520a is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.